Illinois, session 104th, HB5528.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Landlord and Tenant Act is amended by 5adding Section 35 as follows: 6    (765 ILCS 705/35 new)7    Sec. 35. Reporting rental payment history.8(a) As used in this Act:9    "Rent reporter" means a program, account, or similar 10feature that reports a tenant's rent history to credit 11bureaus.12    "Credit bureaus" means one or more of the 3 major credit 13bureaus in the United States that now includes Equifax, 14TransUnion, and Experian.15    "Credit building agreement" means an agreement between a 16landlord and a tenant or tenants allowing the landlord to 17report the tenant's or tenants' rent payment history to a rent 18reporter or credit bureau.19    (b) A landlord may not automatically report any tenant's 20rental payment history to a rent reporter without first 21obtaining consent from the tenant in writing. A landlord shall 22not propose a credit building agreement to the tenant until 23the tenant has entered into a signed residential lease   HB5528- 2 -LRB104 19612 JRC 33061 b1agreement.